Texas statutes.
PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE

TITLE 5. WILDLIFE AND PLANT CONSERVATION

SUBTITLE E. WILDLIFE MANAGEMENT AREAS, SANCTUARIES, AND PRESERVES

CHAPTER 82. STATUTORY SANCTUARIES AND PRESERVES

SUBCHAPTER B. CONNIE HAGAR WILDLIFE SANCTUARY--ROCKPORT

Sec. 82.101. CREATION AND BOUNDARIES. The Connie Hagar Wildlife Sanctuary--Rockport in Aransas County is described as follows:

Being all of the water area of Aransas Bay and Little Bay between the shoreline of Live Oak Peninsula and a line described as follows:

BEGINNING at the point where the city limits of the City of Rockport intersects the shoreline of the Aransas Bay;

THENCE, one mile due east to a point in Aransas Bay;

THENCE, in a northeasterly direction approximately 1-3/8 miles to a point which is 1/2 mile due east of Nine Mile Point;

THENCE, in a north by northwesterly direction approximately 2 miles to a point which is 1/2 mile due east of the channel entrance to the Fulton Harbor;

THENCE, due west to the shoreline of Live Oak Peninsula.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 82.102. BOUNDARY MARKERS. The department shall place suitable markers defining the boundaries of the wildlife sanctuary.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 82.103. UNLAWFUL ACT. No person may hunt any bird or animal within the wildlife sanctuary.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 82.104. PENALTIES. A person who violates any provision of this subchapter commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 96, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

SUBCHAPTER C. SIERRA DIABLO WILDLIFE MANAGEMENT AREA, CULBERSON AND HUDSPETH COUNTIES

Sec. 82.201. CREATION. The department may set aside a fenced game management area in Culberson and Hudspeth counties for the protection and perpetuation of Texas Bighorn Mountain Sheep (Ovis canadensis texiana).

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 72, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 82.202. ACCEPTANCE OF GIFTS. The department may accept gifts of land in Culberson and Hudspeth counties or money to be deposited in the game, fish, and water safety account. The gifts shall be used for the Texas Bighorn Sheep management unit.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 72, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 49, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 82.203. LAND PURCHASE; SCHOOL LANDS. The department may purchase the surface rights in not more than eight sections of public school lands located in Culberson and Hudspeth counties in the following blocks: Blocks 65 and 66, T. & P. Ry. Co. land; Blocks 42-1/2, 43, 54-1/2, Public School Lands. The minerals on the land purchased shall be reserved to the school fund and managed by the school land board. The price to be paid for the land shall not exceed $1 per acre and shall be paid for by the department out of the game, fish, and water safety account.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 72, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 50, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 82.204. OTHER LAND; TITLE APPROVAL. The department may purchase other land in Culberson and Hudspeth counties as necessary for the operation of the game management unit. The department may pay for the land out of the game, fish, and water safety account on approval of the title by the attorney general.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 72, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 51, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 82.205. LAND PURCHASE; PRIVATE. The department may enter on, condemn, and appropriate not more than 12 sections of land belonging to any person or corporation in Culberson and Hudspeth counties for the purpose stated in this subchapter.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 72, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 82.206. CONDEMNATION. The method of condemnation, assessment, and payment of damages is the same as is provided by law for railroads. Condemnation suits brought under this subchapter shall be brought in the name of the State of Texas by the attorney general at the request of the department. All costs in the proceedings shall be paid by the state or by the person against whom the proceedings are had, to be determined as in the case of railroad proceedings. All damages and pay or compensation for property awarded in the proceedings shall be paid by the state by warrant drawn on the game, fish, and water safety account.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 72, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 52, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 82.207. EXPENDITURES. All expenditures provided under this subchapter shall be made from the game, fish, and water safety account .

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 72, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 53, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER D. WILDLIFE SANCTUARY: GALVESTON COUNTY

Sec. 82.301. CREATION. The group of small islands located in Galveston Bay near Smith's Point and known as Vingt et Un Islands are a state wildlife sanctuary.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 82.302. UNLAWFUL ACTS. No person may hunt or in any way molest any of the birds on any of the islands or within 50 yards of the islands, nor may any person enter on the islands for any purpose without first obtaining permission from the department.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 82.303. PENALTIES. A person violating any provision of this subchapter commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 97, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

SUBCHAPTER E. GAME AND FISH RESERVE: MARION AND HARRISON COUNTIES

Sec. 82.401. LAND SET ASIDE. All of the public land and school land situated in, under, and adjacent to the bed of Caddo Lake in the counties of Marion and Harrison are withdrawn from sale and preserved for public use as a state game and fish reserve.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 82.402. CREATION. The department may establish one or more game sanctuaries in the water of Caddo Lake for the protection of wild ducks, geese, and all other migratory birds. The sanctuaries shall protect the birds from being pursued, hunted, taken, or disturbed.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 82.403. BOUNDARY MARKERS. The department shall designate and define the boundaries of the sanctuaries by placing markers or signs around the boundaries of each sanctuary with the words "Game Preserve" on each marker or sign. The markers or signs shall be placed not more than 500 yards apart.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 82.404. AMOUNT OF AREA SET ASIDE. The sanctuaries shall not include more than 20 percent of the area of the lake.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 82.405. PUBLIC HUNTING AND FISHING. The public may hunt and fish on all of the water of the lake except that water set aside for sanctuaries.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 82.406. INVESTIGATION OF FEASIBILITY OF TIMBER LAND PURCHASE. The department, in conjunction with the director of the Texas Forest Service, shall investigate the feasibility and desirability of acquiring title to a block of timbered land adjacent to the lake comprising from 5,000 to 10,000 acres, to be placed under the joint control of the director of the Texas Forest Service and the department, with the view of ultimately preserving a belt of native forest for the future and also for the propagation of game.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 488, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 82.407. MINERAL RIGHTS. The mineral rights under the land reserved for the sanctuaries are withdrawn from sale and the rights may not be offered for sale until the legislature directs the rights to be sold.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 82.408. UNLAWFUL ACTS. (a) No person may hunt any kind of game on the sanctuaries established under this subchapter.

(b) No person may hunt any birds, fowl, or game of any kind on the sanctuaries established under this subchapter.

(c) No person may pursue or frighten or attempt to pursue or frighten any birds, fowl, or game of any kind on the sanctuaries established under this subchapter.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 82.409. PENALTY. A person who violates any provision of this subchapter commits an offense that is a Class B Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 98, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

SUBCHAPTER F. INGLESIDE COVE WILDLIFE SANCTUARY: SAN PATRICIO AND NUECES COUNTIES

Sec. 82.501. CREATION. The Ingleside Cove Wildlife Sanctuary is composed of an area in San Patricio and Nueces counties described as follows:

BEGINNING at Kinney Bayou on the east shoreline of Ingleside Cove, also known as North Shore Channel (N 27 50.791, W 97 13.577);

THENCE, in a northwesterly direction along the shoreline to the channel marker at the location commonly known as Donnel Point (N 27 51.593, W 97 14.505);

THENCE, due northwest crossing the Reynolds Channel to the east side of a spoil bank (N 27 51.668, W 97 14.715);

THENCE, following the eastern edge of this spoil bank in a southeasterly direction to its southernmost point (N 27 50.328, W 97 14.302), continuing southeast crossing Ingleside Cut to the north shore of Ingleside Point (N 27 50.231, W 97 14.197);

THENCE, in an easterly and southeasterly direction along the east shoreline following the Reynolds Channel through Ingleside Point to the southernmost portion of this cut (N 27 49.782, W 97 13.782);

THENCE, due east across the Reynolds Channel to the west shoreline of the mainland known as the southernmost portion of Ingleside Cove (N 27 49.834, W 97 13.641);

THENCE, following the shoreline in a northerly direction being the east shoreline of Ingleside Cove to the point of beginning.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 631 (S.B. 810), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 82.502. MARKING BOUNDARIES. The department shall place suitable markers defining the boundary of the wildlife sanctuary as described in this subchapter.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 82.503. UNLAWFUL ACTS. (a) No person may hunt any bird within the sanctuary.

(b) No person may fish by any means other than rod and reel within the sanctuary.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 82.504. PENALTIES. A person who violates any provision of this subchapter commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 99, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

SUBCHAPTER G. FISH HATCHERIES: SMITH COUNTY

Sec. 82.601. CREATION. The department may construct, enlarge, and maintain fish hatcheries in Smith County.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 82.602. PROPERTY ACQUISITION. The department may enter on, condemn, and appropriate land, water rights, easements, rights-of-way, and property of any person or corporation in Smith County for the purposes designated in this subchapter.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 82.603. CONDEMNATION; MANNER AND MEANS. The method of condemnation, assessment, and payment of damages is the same as is provided for railroads. Condemnation suits brought under this subchapter shall be brought in the name of the State of Texas by the attorney general at the request of the department. All costs in the proceedings shall be paid by the state or by the person against whom the proceedings are had, to be determined as in the case of railroad condemnation proceedings. All damages and pay or compensation for property awarded in the proceedings shall be paid by the state by warrant drawn by the comptroller against any account in the state treasury appropriated to the department for the use of constructing and maintaining fish hatcheries.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 54, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER H. ISLAND CHANNEL

Sec. 82.651. ISLAND CHANNEL. (a) The department may construct and maintain a channel through Padre Island, Mustang Island, and St. Jo Island, or any of them.

(b) The department may contract for the construction of a channel under this section on approval by the commission and approval from the federal government of an application for authority to construct channels.

(c) The cost of the construction and maintenance of a channel constructed under this section may be paid from the game, fish, and water safety account only.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 55, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER I. LAKE CORPUS CHRISTI GAME SANCTUARY

Sec. 82.701. GAME SANCTUARY. All the water of Lake Corpus Christi in San Patricio and Live Oak counties is a game sanctuary.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 82.702. PROHIBITED ACTS. (a) Except as provided in Subsection (b) of this section, no person may enter on the portion of Lake Corpus Christi that is a game sanctuary with a gun or rifle, and no person may attempt to shoot a bird or animal in the portion of Lake Corpus Christi that is a game sanctuary.

(b) A person may hunt ducks and geese during the open seasons for ducks and geese with a shotgun in the portion of Lake Corpus Christi in San Patricio County. This exception does not apply to hunting within one mile of the boy scout camp, the girl scout camp, or Lake Corpus Christi Park.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 82.703. MARKERS. The Parks and Wildlife Department shall erect appropriate markers at intervals adequately spaced to warn hunters of the one-mile limit around the boy scout camp, the girl scout camp, and Lake Corpus Christi Park in San Patricio County.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 82.704. PENALTY. A person who violates Section 82.702 of this code commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 100, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

SUBCHAPTER J. LASALLE COUNTY RIVERS SANCTUARY

Sec. 82.711. CREATION. All of the land area and public water in state-owned riverbeds in LaSalle County, including the Nueces and Frio rivers, is a game sanctuary.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2072, ch. 823, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1977.

Sec. 82.712. PROHIBITED ACTS. (a) Except as permitted under Subsections (b) and (c) of this section, no person may possess, shoot, or hunt with a firearm, bow and arrow, or crossbow in the game sanctuary created by Section 82.711 of this code.

(b) Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to a peace officer of this state, a law enforcement officer of the United States, or a member of the armed forces of the United States or of this state during the time that the officer or member is in the actual discharge of official duties.

(c) Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to waterfowl hunting on any reservoir owned, operated, or maintained by a governmental entity now existing or to be constructed on said rivers.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2072, ch. 823, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1977.

Sec. 82.713. PENALTY. A person who violates Section 82.712 of this code commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2072, ch. 823, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1977. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 101, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

SUBCHAPTER K. MCMULLEN COUNTY RIVERS SANCTUARY

Sec. 82.721. CREATION. All of the land area and public water in state-owned riverbeds in McMullen County, including the Nueces and Frio rivers, is a game sanctuary.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2072, ch. 823, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 29, 1977.

Sec. 82.722. PROHIBITED ACTS. (a) Except as permitted under Subsections (b) and (c) of this section, no person may possess, shoot, or hunt with a firearm, bow and arrow, or crossbow in the game sanctuary created by Section 82.721 of this code.

(b) Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to a peace officer of this state, a law enforcement officer of the United States, or a member of the armed forces of the United States or of this state during the time that the officer or member is in the actual discharge of official duties.

(c) Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to waterfowl hunting on any reservoir owned, operated, or maintained by a governmental entity now existing or to be constructed on said rivers.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2072, ch. 823, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 29, 1977.

Sec. 82.723. PENALTY. A person who violates Section 82.722 of this code commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2072, ch. 823, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 29, 1977. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 102, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

SUBCHAPTER L. BEE COUNTY RIVERS SANCTUARY

Sec. 82.731. CREATION. All of the land area and water in the Aransas and Poesta rivers in Bee County, to the extent same are owned by the state, are declared to be a game sanctuary.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 2080, ch. 471, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1981.

Sec. 82.732. PROHIBITED ACTS. (a) Except as permitted by Subsections (b) and (c) of this section, no person may possess, shoot, or hunt with a firearm, bow and arrow, or crossbow in the game sanctuary created by Section 82.731 of this code.

(b) Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to a peace officer of this state, a law enforcement officer of the United States, or a member of the armed forces of the United States or of this state during the time that the officer or member is in the actual discharge of official duties.

(c) Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to waterfowl hunting on any reservoir owned, operated, or maintained by a governmental entity now existing or to be constructed on the listed rivers.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 2080, ch. 471, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1981.

Sec. 82.733. PENALTY. A person who violates Section 82.732 of this code commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 2080, ch. 471, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1981. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 103, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

SUBCHAPTER O. LIVE OAK COUNTY RIVERS SANCTUARY

Sec. 82.761. CREATION. All of the land area and public water in the state-owned beds of the Nueces, Frio, and Atascosa rivers in Live Oak County is a game sanctuary.

Added by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2083, ch. 814, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 27, 1979.

Sec. 82.762. PROHIBITED ACTS. (a) Except as permitted by Subsections (b) and (c) of this section, no person may possess, shoot, or hunt with a firearm, bow and arrow, or crossbow in the game sanctuary created by Section 82.761 of this code.

(b) Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to a peace officer of this state, a law enforcement officer of the United States, or a member of the armed forces of the United States or of this state during the time that the officer or member is in the actual discharge of official duties.

(c) Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to waterfowl hunting on any reservoir owned, operated, or maintained by a governmental entity now existing or to be constructed on the listed rivers.

Added by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2083, ch. 814, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 27, 1979.

Sec. 82.763. PENALTY. A person who violates Section 82.762 of this code commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2083, ch. 814, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 27, 1979. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 104, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.